Illinois, session 104th, HB5048.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Video Gaming Act is amended by changing 5Section 35 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 40/35)7    Sec. 35. Display of license; confiscation; violation as 8felony. 9    (a) Each video gaming terminal shall be licensed by the 10Board before placement or operation on the premises of a 11licensed establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, 12licensed large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 13establishment, or licensed veterans establishment. The license 14of each video gaming terminal shall be maintained at the 15location where the video gaming terminal is operated. Failure 16to do so is a petty offense with a fine not to exceed $100. Any 17licensed establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, 18licensed large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 19establishment, or licensed veterans establishment used for the 20conduct of gambling games in violation of this Act shall be 21considered a gambling place in violation of Section 28-3 of 22the Criminal Code of 2012. Every gambling device found in a 23licensed establishment, licensed truck stop establishment,   HB5048- 2 -LRB104 18591 LNS 32034 b1licensed large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 2establishment, or licensed veterans establishment operating 3gambling games in violation of this Act shall be subject to 4seizure, confiscation, and destruction as provided in Section 528-5 of the Criminal Code of 2012. Any license issued under the 6Liquor Control Act of 1934 to any owner or operator of a 7licensed establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, 8licensed large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 9establishment, or licensed veterans establishment that 10operates or permits the operation of a video gaming terminal 11within its establishment in violation of this Act shall be 12immediately revoked. No person may own, operate, have in his 13or her possession or custody or under his or her control, or 14permit to be kept in any place under his or her possession or 15control, any device that awards credits and contains a 16circuit, meter, or switch capable of removing and recording 17the removal of credits when the award of credits is dependent 18upon chance. 19    Nothing in this Section shall be deemed to prohibit the 20use of a game device only if the game device is used in an 21activity that is not gambling under subsection (b) of Section 2228-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012. An applicant or licensee is 23not in violation of this Act or any rule of the Board and the 24applicant or licensee is not subject to disciplinary action, 25delay of Board consideration, or denial of any license based 26solely upon the ownership, operation, or possession of a game   HB5048- 3 -LRB104 18591 LNS 32034 b1device if the game device is in compliance with, and not 2considered gambling under, subsection (b) of Section 28-1 or 3item (iii) of subsection (a) of Section 28-2 of the Criminal 4Code of 2012, so long as the device is not connected to the 5Internet in a manner prohibited by paragraph (12) of 6subsection (a) of Section 28-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012. 7Any applicant previously denied a license by the Board based 8in whole or in part on the participation in or operation of 9game devices, including devices characterized by the Board as 10sweepstakes devices, that were otherwise lawful under 11subsection (b) of Section 28-1 or item (iii) of subsection (a) 12of Section 28-2 of the Criminal Code of 2012 shall have the 13denial rescinded and a license shall be issued as soon as 14possible, so long as the applicant otherwise meets the 15requirements of this Act. For any application for a license 16under this Act that discloses participation in or operation of 17game devices lawful under subsection (b) of Section 28-1 or 18item (iii) of subsection (a) of Section 28-2 of the Criminal 19Code of 2012, the Board shall process the application within 2090 days after the date the application is filed. 21    A violation of this Section is a Class 4 felony. All 22devices that are owned, operated, or possessed in violation of 23this Section are hereby declared to be public nuisances and 24shall be subject to seizure, confiscation, and destruction as 25provided in Section 28-5 of the Criminal Code of 2012. 26    The provisions of this Section do not apply to devices or   HB5048- 4 -LRB104 18591 LNS 32034 b1electronic video game terminals licensed pursuant to this Act. 2A video gaming terminal operated for amusement only and 3bearing a valid amusement tax sticker shall not be subject to 4this Section until 30 days after the Board establishes that 5the central communications system is functional. 6    (b) (1) The odds of winning each video game shall be posted 7on or near each video gaming terminal. The manner in which the 8odds are calculated and how they are posted shall be 9determined by the Board by rule.10    (2) No video gaming terminal licensed under this Act may 11be played except during the legal hours of operation allowed 12for the consumption of alcoholic beverages at the licensed 13establishment, licensed fraternal establishment, or licensed 14veterans establishment. A licensed establishment, licensed 15fraternal establishment, or licensed veterans establishment 16that violates this subsection is subject to termination of its 17license by the Board. 18(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.) 19    Section 10. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 20changing Sections 28-1 and 28-2 as follows: 21    (720 ILCS 5/28-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 28-1)22    Sec. 28-1. Gambling. 23    (a) A person commits gambling when he or she:24        (1) knowingly plays a game of chance or skill for   HB5048- 5 -LRB104 18591 LNS 32034 b1    money or other thing of value, unless excepted in 2    subsection (b) of this Section;3        (2) knowingly makes a wager upon the result of any 4    game, contest, or any political nomination, appointment or 5    election;6        (3) knowingly operates, keeps, owns, uses, purchases, 7    exhibits, rents, sells, bargains for the sale or lease of, 8    manufactures or distributes any gambling device;9        (4) contracts to have or give himself or herself or 10    another the option to buy or sell, or contracts to buy or 11    sell, at a future time, any grain or other commodity 12    whatsoever, or any stock or security of any company, where 13    it is at the time of making such contract intended by both 14    parties thereto that the contract to buy or sell, or the 15    option, whenever exercised, or the contract resulting 16    therefrom, shall be settled, not by the receipt or 17    delivery of such property, but by the payment only of 18    differences in prices thereof; however, the issuance, 19    purchase, sale, exercise, endorsement or guarantee, by or 20    through a person registered with the Secretary of State 21    pursuant to Section 8 of the Illinois Securities Law of 22    1953, or by or through a person exempt from such 23    registration under said Section 8, of a put, call, or 24    other option to buy or sell securities which have been 25    registered with the Secretary of State or which are exempt 26    from such registration under Section 3 of the Illinois   HB5048- 6 -LRB104 18591 LNS 32034 b1    Securities Law of 1953 is not gambling within the meaning 2    of this paragraph (4);3        (5) knowingly owns or possesses any book, instrument 4    or apparatus by means of which bets or wagers have been, or 5    are, recorded or registered, or knowingly possesses any 6    money which he has received in the course of a bet or 7    wager;8        (6) knowingly sells pools upon the result of any game 9    or contest of skill or chance, political nomination, 10    appointment or election;11        (7) knowingly sets up or promotes any lottery or 12    sells, offers to sell or transfers any ticket or share for 13    any lottery;14        (8) knowingly sets up or promotes any policy game or 15    sells, offers to sell or knowingly possesses or transfers 16    any policy ticket, slip, record, document or other similar 17    device;18        (9) knowingly drafts, prints or publishes any lottery 19    ticket or share, or any policy ticket, slip, record, 20    document or similar device, except for such activity 21    related to lotteries, bingo games and raffles authorized 22    by and conducted in accordance with the laws of Illinois 23    or any other state or foreign government;24        (10) knowingly advertises any lottery or policy game, 25    except for such activity related to lotteries, bingo games 26    and raffles authorized by and conducted in accordance with   HB5048- 7 -LRB104 18591 LNS 32034 b1    the laws of Illinois or any other state;2        (11) knowingly transmits information as to wagers, 3    betting odds, or changes in betting odds by telephone, 4    telegraph, radio, semaphore or similar means; or knowingly 5    installs or maintains equipment for the transmission or 6    receipt of such information; except that nothing in this 7    subdivision (11) prohibits transmission or receipt of such 8    information for use in news reporting of sporting events 9    or contests; or10        (12) knowingly establishes, maintains, or operates an 11    Internet site that permits a person to play a game of 12    chance or skill for money or other thing of value by means 13    of the Internet or to make a wager upon the result of any 14    game, contest, political nomination, appointment, or 15    election by means of the Internet. This item (12) does not 16    apply to activities referenced in items (6), (6.1), (8), 17    (8.1), and (15) of subsection (b) of this Section. 18    (b) Participants in any of the following activities shall 19not be convicted of gambling:20        (1) Agreements to compensate for loss caused by the 21    happening of chance including without limitation contracts 22    of indemnity or guaranty and life or health or accident 23    insurance.24        (2) Offers of prizes, award or compensation to the 25    actual contestants in any bona fide contest for the 26    determination of skill, speed, strength or endurance or to   HB5048- 8 -LRB104 18591 LNS 32034 b1    the owners of animals or vehicles entered in such contest.2        (3) Pari-mutuel betting as authorized by the law of 3    this State.4        (4) Manufacture of gambling devices, including the 5    acquisition of essential parts therefor and the assembly 6    thereof, for transportation in interstate or foreign 7    commerce to any place outside this State when such 8    transportation is not prohibited by any applicable Federal 9    law; or the manufacture, distribution, or possession of 10    video gaming terminals, as defined in the Video Gaming 11    Act, by manufacturers, distributors, and terminal 12    operators licensed to do so under the Video Gaming Act.13        (5) The game commonly known as "bingo", when conducted 14    in accordance with the Bingo License and Tax Act.15        (6) Lotteries when conducted by the State of Illinois 16    in accordance with the Illinois Lottery Law. This 17    exemption includes any activity conducted by the 18    Department of Revenue to sell lottery tickets pursuant to 19    the provisions of the Illinois Lottery Law and its rules.20        (6.1) The purchase of lottery tickets through the 21    Internet for a lottery conducted by the State of Illinois 22    under the program established in Section 7.12 of the 23    Illinois Lottery Law. 24        (7) Possession of an antique slot machine that is 25    neither used nor intended to be used in the operation or 26    promotion of any unlawful gambling activity or enterprise.   HB5048- 9 -LRB104 18591 LNS 32034 b1    For the purpose of this subparagraph (b)(7), an antique 2    slot machine is one manufactured 25 years ago or earlier.3        (8) Raffles and poker runs when conducted in 4    accordance with the Raffles and Poker Runs Act.5        (8.1) The purchase of raffle chances for a raffle 6    conducted in accordance with the Raffles and Poker Runs 7    Act. 8        (9) Charitable games when conducted in accordance with 9    the Charitable Games Act.10        (10) Pull tabs and jar games when conducted under the 11    Illinois Pull Tabs and Jar Games Act.12        (11) Gambling games when authorized by the Illinois 13    Gambling Act.14        (12) Video gaming terminal games at a licensed 15    establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, licensed 16    large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 17    establishment, or licensed veterans establishment when 18    conducted in accordance with the Video Gaming Act. 19        (13) Games of skill or chance where money or other 20    things of value can be won but no payment or purchase is 21    required to participate as provided for in Section 10 of 22    the Prizes and Gifts Act, except if participation in that 23    game of chance is accomplished using a gambling device 24    prohibited by item (iii) of subsection (a) of Section 25    28-2. 26        (14) Savings promotion raffles authorized under   HB5048- 10 -LRB104 18591 LNS 32034 b1    Section 5g of the Illinois Banking Act, Section 7008 of 2    the Savings Bank Act, Section 42.7 of the Illinois Credit 3    Union Act, Section 5136B of the National Bank Act (12 4    U.S.C. 25a), or Section 4 of the Home Owners' Loan Act (12 5    U.S.C. 1463). 6        (15) Sports wagering when conducted in accordance with 7    the Sports Wagering Act. 8    (c) Sentence.9        (1) Gambling is a Class A misdemeanor. A second or 10    subsequent conviction under subsections (a)(3) through 11    (a)(12), is a Class 4 felony.12        (2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) or any other 13    provision of this Section, a gambling offense involving a 14    device described in item (iii) of subsection (a) of 15    Section 28-2 is a Class 4 felony. 16    (d) Circumstantial evidence.17    In prosecutions under this Section circumstantial evidence 18shall have the same validity and weight as in any criminal 19prosecution.20    Municipal restrictions prohibited. 21    No municipality shall impose any restriction or 22prohibition related to an activity that is lawful under 23subsection (b) of this Section. Any restriction or prohibition 24in place by any municipality before the effective date of this 25amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly shall be void and 26unenforceable.  HB5048- 11 -LRB104 18591 LNS 32034 b1(Source: P.A. 101-31, Article 25, Section 25-915, eff. 26-28-19; 101-31, Article 35, Section 35-80, eff. 6-28-19; 3101-109, eff. 7-19-19; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 4    (720 ILCS 5/28-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 28-2)5    Sec. 28-2. Definitions. 6    (a) A "gambling device" is (i) any clock, tape machine, 7slot machine or other machines or device for the reception of 8money or other thing of value on chance or skill or upon the 9action of which money or other thing of value is staked, 10hazarded, bet, won, or lost; (ii) or any mechanism, furniture, 11fixture, equipment, or other device designed primarily for use 12in a gambling place; or (iii) any vending or other electronic 13machine or device, including, without limitation, a machine or 14device that awards credits and contains a circuit, meter, or 15switch capable of removing and recording the removal of 16credits or that is connected directly or indirectly to the 17Internet, by cellular modem, hardwired, or wireless 18connection, or to a set of interconnected networked devices in 19order to participate in the game or contest or to receive or 20retrieve any data related to the device, except if the 21connected device is a redemption vault that is for the sole 22purpose of redeeming a prize or award or a prize and gift kiosk 23as defined in Section 10 of the Prizes and Gifts Act. A 24"gambling device" does not include:25        (1) A coin-in-the-slot operated mechanical device   HB5048- 12 -LRB104 18591 LNS 32034 b1    played for amusement which rewards the player with the 2    right to replay such mechanical device, which device is so 3    constructed or devised as to make such result of the 4    operation thereof depend in part upon the skill of the 5    player and which returns to the player thereof no money, 6    property, or right to receive money or property.7        (2) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection 8    (a), a vending machine Vending machines by which full and 9    adequate return is made for the money invested and in 10    which there is no element of chance or hazard; or a prize 11    and gift kiosk as described in Sections 10 and 33 of the 12    Prizes and Gifts Act.13        (3) A crane game. For the purposes of this paragraph 14    (3), a "crane game" is an amusement device involving 15    skill, if it rewards the player exclusively with 16    merchandise contained within the amusement device proper 17    and limited to toys, novelties, and prizes other than 18    currency, each having a wholesale value which is not more 19    than $25.20        (4) A redemption machine. For the purposes of this 21    paragraph (4), a "redemption machine" is a single-player 22    or multi-player amusement device involving a game, the 23    object of which is throwing, rolling, bowling, shooting, 24    placing, or propelling a ball or other object that is 25    either physical or computer generated on a display or with 26    lights into, upon, or against a hole or other target that   HB5048- 13 -LRB104 18591 LNS 32034 b1    is either physical or computer generated on a display or 2    with lights, or stopping, by physical, mechanical, or 3    electronic means, a moving object that is either physical 4    or computer generated on a display or with lights into, 5    upon, or against a hole or other target that is either 6    physical or computer generated on a display or with 7    lights, provided that all of the following conditions are 8    met:9            (A) The outcome of the game is predominantly 10        determined by the skill of the player.11            (B) The award of the prize is based solely upon the 12        player's achieving the object of the game or otherwise 13        upon the player's score.14            (C) Only merchandise prizes are awarded.15            (D) The wholesale value of prizes awarded in lieu 16        of tickets or tokens for single play of the device does 17        not exceed $25.18            (E) The redemption value of tickets, tokens, and 19        other representations of value, which may be 20        accumulated by players to redeem prizes of greater 21        value, for a single play of the device does not exceed 22        $25.23        (5) Video gaming terminals at a licensed 24    establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, licensed 25    large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 26    establishment, or licensed veterans establishment licensed   HB5048- 14 -LRB104 18591 LNS 32034 b1    in accordance with the Video Gaming Act. 2    (a-5) "Internet" means an interactive computer service or 3system or an information service, system, or access software 4provider that provides or enables computer access by multiple 5users to a computer server, and includes, but is not limited 6to, an information service, system, or access software 7provider that provides access to a network system commonly 8known as the Internet, or any comparable system or service and 9also includes, but is not limited to, a World Wide Web page, 10newsgroup, message board, mailing list, or chat area on any 11interactive computer service or system or other online 12service.13    (a-6) "Access" has the meaning ascribed to the term in 14Section 17-55.15    (a-7) "Computer" has the meaning ascribed to the term in 16Section 17-0.5. 17    (b) A "lottery" is any scheme or procedure whereby one or 18more prizes are distributed by chance among persons who have 19paid or promised consideration for a chance to win such 20prizes, whether such scheme or procedure is called a lottery, 21raffle, gift, sale, or some other name, excluding savings 22promotion raffles authorized under Section 5g of the Illinois 23Banking Act, Section 7008 of the Savings Bank Act, Section 2442.7 of the Illinois Credit Union Act, Section 5136B of the 25National Bank Act (12 U.S.C. 25a), or Section 4 of the Home 26Owners' Loan Act (12 U.S.C. 1463).  HB5048- 15 -LRB104 18591 LNS 32034 b1    (c) A "policy game" is any scheme or procedure whereby a 2person promises or guarantees by any instrument, bill, 3certificate, writing, token, or other device that any 4particular number, character, ticket, or certificate shall in 5the event of any contingency in the nature of a lottery entitle 6the purchaser or holder to receive money, property, or 7evidence of debt.8(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 101-87, eff. 1-1-20; 9102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 10    Section 15. The Prizes and Gifts Act is amended by 11changing Section 10 and by adding Sections 33 and 45 as 12follows: 13    (815 ILCS 525/10)14    Sec. 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:15    "Bona fide product" means any item of real value, 16including gift certificates to be used for or toward the 17purchase of a retail item. "Bona fide product" does not 18include a discount coupon, an item with Internet access, a 19telephone card, a calling card, or a phone card. 20    "Catalog seller" means an entity (and its subsidiaries) or 21a person at least 50% of whose annual revenues are derived from 22the sale of products sold in connection with the distribution 23of catalogs of at least 24 pages, which contain written 24descriptions or illustrations and sale prices for each item of   HB5048- 16 -LRB104 18591 LNS 32034 b1merchandise and which are distributed in more than one state 2with a total annual distribution of at least 250,000.3    "Discount coupon" means a coupon that has a value worth 4double the amount inserted into the electronic product 5promotion kiosk and is used to offset the price of a retail 6item at a store with a physical location or ecommerce website. 7    "No Payment or Purchase option" means the option to 8participate in a prize and gift kiosk without inserting 9anything of value and limited to obtaining a code that will 10allow for free participation through the mail pursuant to 11instructions contained within the prize and gift kiosk. 12    "Person" means a corporation, partnership, limited 13liability company, sole proprietorship, or natural person.14    "Prize" means a gift, award, or other item or service of 15value that is offered or awarded to a participant in a real or 16purported contest, competition, sweepstakes, scheme, plan, or 17other selection process that involves an element of chance.18    "Prize and gift kiosk" means a device that: (i) is used to 19promote the purchase of a bona fide product and offers or 20awards a prize, including cash, without requiring payment or 21purchase to participate in compliance with paragraph (12) of 22subsection (a) and paragraph (13) of subsection (b) of Section 2328-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012; (ii) contains a fill system 24that permits the operation of the device solely determined on 25a fee basis or the amount of revenue generated, excluding a 26system based on time, the number of spins or equivalents to   HB5048- 17 -LRB104 18591 LNS 32034 b1spins, or any other nonrevenue-based system; (iii) 2automatically ceases to operate upon the completion of a 3predetermined cycle; and (iv) contains a route boost plus 4internal monitoring system. "Prize and gift kiosk" does not 5include a device that is connected directly or indirectly to 6the Internet, by cellular modem, hardwired, or wireless 7connection, or to a set of interconnected networked devices in 8order to participate in the game or contest or to receive or 9retrieve any data related to the device, unless the connected 10device is a redemption vault that is for the sole purpose of 11redeeming a prize or award. 12    "Retail value" of a prize means: 13        (1) a price at which the sponsor can substantiate that 14    a substantial quantity of the item or service offered as a 15    prize has been sold to the public; or 16        (2) if the sponsor is unable to satisfy the 17    requirement in subdivision (1), no more than 3 times the 18    amount the sponsor paid for the prize in a bona fide 19    purchase from an unaffiliated seller.20    "Route boost plus" means an internal monitoring system 21that accounts and records: (i) cash in; (ii) winnings; (iii) 22entries utilized; (iv) power failures, disconnections from the 23monitoring system and malfunctions; and (v) remote activations 24and disabling. However, the monitoring system shall not be 25able to control or in any way alter the play of the prize and 26gift kiosk and shall not provide for the monitoring or reading   HB5048- 18 -LRB104 18591 LNS 32034 b1of personal or financial information concerning patrons. 2    "Sponsor" means a person on whose behalf a promotion is 3conducted to promote or advertise goods, services, or property 4of that person. "Sponsor" includes a person who conducts a 5promotion on behalf of another sponsor.6(Source: P.A. 92-436, eff. 1-1-02.) 7    (815 ILCS 525/33 new)8    Sec. 33. Prize and gift kiosk operation. 9    (a) No person may operate on any premises a prize and gift 10kiosk that fails to meet the technical standard set in Section 1110.12    (b) No prize and gift kiosk may be connected directly or 13indirectly to the Internet, by cellular modem, hardwired or 14wireless connection, or to a set of interconnected networked 15devices in order to participate in the game or contest or to 16receive or retrieve any data related to the kiosk or device 17unless the connected device is a redemption vault.18    (c) No prize and gift kiosk may offer the sale of anything 19other than a bona fide product.20    (d) No person may operate a prize and gift kiosk without a 21self-contained fill system that permits the operation of the 22device solely determined on a fee basis or the amount of 23revenue generated, excluding a system based on time, the 24number of spins or equivalents to spins, or other 25nonrevenue-based system and automatically ceases to operate   HB5048- 19 -LRB104 18591 LNS 32034 b1upon the completion of a predetermined cycle.2    (e) No person may operate a prize and gift kiosk without a 3route boost plus internal monitoring system.4    (f) A prize and gift kiosk may not offer No Payment or 5Purchase options other than those provided for in Section 10. 6    (815 ILCS 525/45 new)7    Sec. 45. Fee. Each person or business operating a prize 8and gift kiosk shall be registered with the Department of 9Revenue under the Department of Revenue Form REG-1-A and shall 10register each prize and gift kiosk as a Coin-Operated 11Amusement Device under Section 8i of the Form RCOA-1. Each 12person or business operating a prize and gift kiosk shall 13remit the annual fees for registration as set by the 14Department. Filing for a device other than a prize and gift 15kiosk shall be considered filing a false report or form with 16the State. Violators shall be subject to any and all penalties 17for that violation, including, but not limited to, the seizure 18of the device. The Department of Revenue and the Illinois 19Liquor Control Commission or its designee, including any 20public private task force, shall have jurisdiction. 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.